Tennessee, session 114, HB2034.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 16, Chapter 18, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, if a municipal court has found a
person or entity to be in violation of a municipal ordinance related to the maintenance of
property and the person or entity in violation of the municipal ordinance has failed to
remedy the property maintenance violation within thirty (30) days of the municipal court's
finding that the ordinance has been violated, then the municipal court may order the
municipality to remedy the ordinance violation at a cost in conformity with reasonable
standards.
(b) The cost of remediation must be assessed against the owner of the property
in the form of a lien upon the property in favor of the municipality.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2034
009841
- 1 -